California statutes. Public Resources Code
(e) A home energy rating or energy assessment service does not meet the requirements of this section unless the service has been certified by the commission to be in compliance with the program criteria developed pursuant to this section and is in conformity with other applicable elements of the program.

(f) (1) The commission shall periodically update the criteria and adopt any revision that, in its judgment, is necessary to improve or refine program requirements after receiving public input.

(2) On or before January 1, 2017, and at least once every three years thereafter, the commission shall adopt an update to the program in furtherance of achieving
 a cumulative doubling of statewide energy efficiency savings in electricity and natural gas final end uses of retail customers by January 1, 2030.

(g) Before implementing an element of the program developed pursuant to subdivision (a) that requires the expansion of statutory authority of the commission or the Public Utilities Commission, the commission and the Public Utilities Commission shall obtain legislative approval for the expansion of their authorities.

(h) The commission shall report on the status of the program in the integrated energy policy report pursuant to Section 25302.

(i) The commission shall fund activities undertaken pursuant to this section from the Federal Trust Fund consistent with the federal
 American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) or other sources of nonstate funds available to the commission for the purposes of this section.

(j) For purposes of this section, the following terms mean the following:

(1) “Energy assessment” means a determination of an energy user’s energy consumption level, relative efficiency compared to other users, and opportunities to achieve greater efficiency or improve energy resource utilization.

(2) “Energy efficiency” means delivering equal or more services with less energy input from an energy source.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 547, Sec. 8.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Gas Appliances [25950. - 25968.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [25950. - 25953.]

25950.

“Gas appliance” means any new residential-type furnace, air conditioner, heater, refrigerator, stove, range, dishwasher, dryer, decorative fireplace log, or other similar device, except a water heater, which uses a gaseous fuel for operation and is automatically ignited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1411.)
-------------------------------------------

25951.

“Pilot light” means any gas operated device that remains continually operated or lighted in order to ignite a gas appliance to begin normal operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1411.)
-------------------------------------------

25952.

“Intermittent ignition device” means an ignition device which is actuated only when the gas appliance is in operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1411.)
-------------------------------------------

25953.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, manufacturer, distributor, retailer, contractor or builder as defined in Section 7026 of the Business and Professions Code, or other groups, however organized, who sell or cause to be distributed or installed, any new gas appliance as defined in Section 25950.

(b) “Manufacturer” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal relationship that manufactures, assembles, produces, or gathers consumer goods.

(c) “Distributor” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal relationship that stands between the manufacturer and the retail seller in purchases, consignments, or contracts for sale of consumer goods.

(d) “Retail seller,” “retail outlets,” “seller,” or “retailer” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal relationship that engages in the business of selling new goods to retail buyers.

(e) “Contractor” for the purpose of this chapter is synonymous with the term “builder” and, within the meaning of this chapter, a contractor is any person who undertakes to or offers to undertake to or purports to have the capacity to undertake to or submits a bid to, or does themselves or by or through others, construct, alter, repair, add to, subtract from, improve, move, wreck, or demolish any building, highway, road,
 parking facility, railroad, excavation, or other structure, project, development, or improvement, or to do any part thereof, including the erection of scaffolding or other structures or works in connection therewith. The term “contractor” includes subcontractor and specialty contractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 34.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [25960. - 25968.]

25960.

No new residential-type gas appliance that is equipped with a pilot light shall be sold in the state after an alternate means has been certified by the commission. This prohibition shall become operative 24 months after an intermittent ignition device has been demonstrated and certified by the commission as an alternate means. The commission may determine, after demonstration, that there is no feasible alternative means to the use of pilot light or that the use of a pilot light is necessary for public health and safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 248.)
-------------------------------------------

25960.5.

Notwithstanding the prohibition contained in Section 25960, any swimming pool heater with a pilot light which was manufactured prior to February 24, 1984, and in stock or on order as of that date, may be sold in this state prior to December 1, 1984. On or after December 1, 1984, no swimming pool heater may be sold or offered for sale, unless it is equipped with an intermittent ignition device or is designed to burn only liquefied petroleum gases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 26, Sec. 1.   Effective March 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

25961.

The commission shall, on or before January 1, 1976, develop in cooperation with affected industry and consumer representatives, who will be designated as such representatives by the commission, the specifications for certification of intermittent ignition devices which shall not significantly affect the price of gas appliances in competition with similar electrical appliances. The specification shall be developed so as to result in the conservation of primary energy resources, shall include provisions necessary for public health and safety, and shall give due consideration to the initial costs, including installation and maintenance costs imposed upon the consumer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1411.)
-------------------------------------------

25962.

Within 90 days after an intermittent ignition device has been certified by the commission, the commission shall notify all gas appliance manufacturers doing business in the state, as to the prohibition of affected pilot lights and shall inform the manufacturers of the devices available to comply with this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 135.)
-------------------------------------------

25963.

The commission shall create a seal of certification and shall distribute the seal to every manufacturer that complies with this article. The seal shall be affixed to every new appliance sold in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1411.)
-------------------------------------------

25964.

After 24 months after an intermittent ignition device has been certified by the commission, no person shall sell or offer for sale in this state any new gas appliances, as defined in Section 25950, without obtaining the proper seal of certification from the commission, unless the commission otherwise permits such action. Beginning 24 months after an intermittent ignition device has been certified by the commission, no city or county, city and county, or state agency shall issue a permit for any building to be equipped with any new gas appliance, as defined in Section 25950, unless such building permit shows that the gas appliance complies with this chapter. However, any new gas appliance which does not comply with this chapter may be installed if the appliance was purchased pursuant to a contract executed prior to June 17, 1978, and if the building permit was approved prior to July 8, 1978.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 375.)
-------------------------------------------

25965.

After 24 months after an intermittent ignition device has been certified by the commission, the commission shall make periodic inspections of manufacturers and distributors of gas appliances and may inspect retail outlets, including gas appliances that have been or are to be installed by contractors or builders at building sites in order to determine their compliance with this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 135.)
-------------------------------------------

25966.

Any person who violates or proposes to violate this chapter may be enjoined by any court of competent jurisdiction. The court may make such orders or judgments, including the appointment of a receiver, as may be necessary to prevent the use or employment by any person of any practices which violate this chapter, or which may be necessary to restore to any person in interest any money or property, real or personal, which may have been acquired by means of any practice which violates any provision of this chapter.

Actions for injunction under this section may be prosecuted by the Attorney General or any district attorney, county counsel, city attorney, or city prosecutor in this state in the name of the people of the State of California upon their own complaint or upon the complaint of any board, officer, person, corporation or association or by any person acting for the interests of itself, its members or the general public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1411.)
-------------------------------------------

25967.

(a) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation, which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney, county counsel, or city attorney in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) If the action is brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the State Treasurer. If brought by a district attorney or county counsel, the entire amount of penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the county and one-half to the city.

(c) If the action is brought at the request of the commission, the court shall determine the reasonable expenses incurred by the commission in the investigation and prosecution of the action.

Before any penalty collected is paid out pursuant to subdivision (b), the amount of such reasonable expenses incurred by the commission shall be paid to the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1411.)
-------------------------------------------

25968.

Any inspector appointed or authorized by the commission shall have access to the premises, equipment, materials, partly finished and finished articles, and records of any person subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1411.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Solar Shade Control [25980. - 25986.]

25980.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Solar Shade Control Act. It is the policy of the state to promote all feasible means of energy conservation and all feasible uses of alternative energy supply sources. In particular, the state encourages the planting and maintenance of trees and shrubs to create shading, moderate outdoor temperatures, and provide various economic and aesthetic benefits. However, there are certain situations in which the need for widespread use of alternative energy devices, such as solar collectors, requires specific and limited controls on trees and shrubs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1366.)
-------------------------------------------

25981.

(a) As used in this chapter, “solar collector” means a fixed device, structure, or part of a device or structure, on the roof of a building, that is used primarily to transform solar energy into thermal, chemical, or electrical energy. The solar collector shall be used as part of a system that makes use of solar energy for any or all of the following purposes:

(1) Water heating.

(2) Space heating or cooling.

(3) Power generation.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for the purpose of this chapter, “solar collector” includes a fixed device, structure, or part of a device or structure that is used primarily to transform solar energy into thermal, chemical, or electrical energy and that is installed on the ground because a solar collector cannot be installed on the roof of the building receiving the energy due to inappropriate roofing material, slope of the roof, structural shading, or orientation of the building.

(c) For the purposes of this chapter, “solar collector” does not include a solar collector that is designed and intended to offset more than the building’s electricity demand.

(d) For purposes of this chapter, the location of a solar collector is required to comply with the local building and setback regulations, and to be set back not less than five feet from the property line, and not less than 10 feet above the ground. A solar collector may be less than 10 feet in height only if, in addition to the five-foot setback, the solar collector is set back three times the amount lowered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 176, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25982.

After the installation of a solar collector, a person owning or in control of another property shall not allow a tree or shrub to be placed or, if placed, to grow on that property so as to cast a shadow greater than 10 percent of the collector absorption area upon that solar collector surface at any one time between the hours of 10 a.m. and 2 p.m., local standard time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 176, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25982.1.

(a) An owner of a building where a solar collector is proposed to be installed may provide written notice by certified mail to a person owning property that may be affected by the requirements of this chapter prior to the installation of the solar collector. If a notice is mailed, the notice shall be mailed no more than 60 days prior to installation of the solar collector and shall read as follows: SOLAR SHADE CONTROL NOTICEUnder the Solar Shade Control Act (California Public Resources Code §25980 et seq.) a tree or shrub cannot cast a shadow greater than 10 percent of a solar collector absorption area upon that solar collector surface at any one time between the hours of 10 a.m. and 2 p.m. local standard time if the tree or shrub is placed after installation of a solar collector. The owner of the building where a solar collector is proposed to be installed is providing this written notice to persons owning property that may be affected by the requirements of the act no more than 60 days prior to the installation of a solar collector. The building owner is providing the following information:Name and address of building owner:Telephone number of building owner:Address of building and specific location where a solar collector will be installed (including street number and name, city/county, ZIP Code, and assessor’s book, page, and parcel number):Installation date of solar collector:__________________________Building Owner, Date

(b) If the owner of the building where a solar collector is proposed to be installed provided the notice pursuant to subdivision (a), and the installation date is later than the date specified in that notice, the later date shall be specified in a subsequent notice to persons receiving the initial notice.

(c) (1) A transferor of the building where the solar collector is installed may provide a record of persons receiving the notice pursuant to subdivision (a) to a transferee of the building.

(2) A transferor receiving a notice pursuant to subdivision (a) may provide the notice to a transferee of the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 176, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25983.

A tree or shrub that is maintained in violation of Section 25982 is a private nuisance, as defined in Section 3481 of the Civil Code, if the person who maintains or permits the tree or shrub to be maintained fails to remove or alter the tree or shrub after receiving a written notice from the owner or agent of the affected solar collector requesting compliance with the requirements of Section 25982.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 176, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25984.

This chapter does not apply to any of the following:

(a) A tree or shrub planted prior to the installation of a solar collector.

(b) A tree planted, grown, or harvested on timberland as defined in Section 4526 or on land devoted to the production of commercial agricultural crops.

(c) The replacement of a tree or shrub that had been growing prior to the installation of a solar collector and that, subsequent to the installation of the solar collector, dies, or is removed for the protection of public health, safety, or the environment.

(d) A tree or shrub that is subject to a city or county ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 176, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25985.

(a) A city, or for unincorporated areas, a county, may adopt, by majority vote of the governing body, an ordinance exempting their jurisdiction from the provisions of this chapter. The adoption of the ordinance shall not be subject to the California Environmental Quality Act (commencing with Section 21000).

(b) Notwithstanding the requirements of this chapter, a city or a county ordinance specifying requirements for tree preservation or solar shade control shall govern within the jurisdiction of the city or county that adopted the ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25986.

Any person who plans a passive or natural solar heating system or cooling system or heating and cooling system which would impact on an adjacent active solar system may seek equitable relief in a court of competent jurisdiction to exempt such system from the provisions of this chapter. The court may grant such an exemption based on a finding that the passive or natural system would provide a demonstrably greater net energy savings than the active system which would be impacted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1366.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Energy Management Plans for Harbor and Port Districts [25990. - 25990.]

25990.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, the term “district” shall mean the Humboldt Bay Harbor, Recreation, and Conservation District, the Ports of Hueneme, Oakland, Long Beach, Los Angeles, Redwood City, Richmond, San Diego, San Francisco, Stockton, and West Sacramento, and any other harbor, recreation, and conservation district that operates a harbor or port in the state. A district may prepare one or more energy management plans, developed jointly with an electrical corporation, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code, a gas corporation, as defined in Section 222 of the Public Utilities Code, a community choice aggregator established on or before July 1, 2013, or a public utility, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 216 of the
 Public Utilities Code, that produces, generates, or supplies electricity to the public and that serves the district in order to reduce air emissions, promote economic development, and encourage the development of new businesses and retain existing businesses in that district.

(b) If a district prepares an energy management plan pursuant to this chapter, it shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) An assessment of current energy consumption within the district by energy source and type of users. Examples of users may include commercial, industrial, governmental, ships, individual transport, and product transport.

(2) An assessment of other energy efficiency and management issues the district determines to evaluate in order to inform the development of specific goals and actions that reduce air emissions
 and promote economic development, including all of the following:

(A) An electric or natural gas load forecast, developed in coordination with the serving electrical corporation, gas corporation, community choice aggregator established on or before July 1, 2013, or local publicly owned electric or gas utility that reflects anticipated load growth within the district.

(B) An assessment of the role that distributed generation, combined with accurately priced utility services, could play in providing greater rate stability and energy cost certainty to aid in economic development, and proposed actions with respect to that role. This assessment shall be developed jointly with the serving electrical corporation, gas corporation, community choice aggregator established on or before July 1, 2013, or local publicly owned electric or gas utility.

(C) An assessment, in consultation with business and industry, that identifies current and emerging processes and technologies to reduce energy consumption and improve energy efficiency.

(D) An assessment, in consultation with business and industry, that identifies domestic and international shipping requirements and operations related to energy use and consumption.

(3) A set of measurable energy performance and management goals that reduce air emissions and promote economic development, and a prioritized list of infrastructure projects, public education initiatives, and other actions that the district will undertake to achieve those goals. 

(4) A list of recommendations, developed jointly with the serving electrical corporation, gas corporation, community
 choice aggregator established on or before July 1, 2013, or local publicly owned electric or gas utility for the enhanced use of cost-effective energy efficiency and demand-side management in existing buildings and the inclusion of energy efficiency measures as part of the development of new buildings.

(5) A description of measures to be taken to reduce air emissions for vehicle use within district boundaries, including vehicles used for movement of commercial products. Proposed actions, developed jointly with the serving electrical corporation, gas corporation, community choice aggregator established on or before July 1, 2013, or local publicly owned electric utility, may include replacement of vehicles with lower emitting alternatives and development of infrastructure, in appropriate areas, to aid in the refueling of alternative fuel vehicles.

(6) A summary identifying
 governmental and nongovernmental impediments to implementation of the plan that includes recommendations on how these impediments may be overcome.

(7) A description of one-year, 3-year, 5-year, 10-year, and 15-year objectives for implementation of the plan. These objectives shall be in sufficient detail to allow the district to undertake a meaningful annual review of the plan’s progress.

(8) Proposed methods to fund the activities included in the plan, including funding through utility ratepayer-funded programs.

(9) Other related energy plans, mandates, and requirements, and, to the extent possible, leverage opportunities for achieving energy efficiency and sustainable energy production, while not overburdening impacted businesses.

(c) A district that
 prepares a plan shall engage with small business technical assistance providers to assist in the identification of joint or collaborative energy efficiency project opportunities, public education activities, and financing opportunities that implement the actions and projects in the plan.

(d) The Public Utilities Commission shall encourage electric or gas corporations to participate jointly with local agencies in developing, implementing, and administering viable energy management plans for districts. The governing boards of local publicly owned utilities, community choice aggregators established on or before July 1, 2013, and rural electric cooperatives shall encourage joint participation with local agencies and gas corporations in developing, implementing, and administering viable energy management plans for districts.

(e) If an energy management plan is prepared pursuant to this
 chapter, it shall also address the development of projects that provide greater certainty of energy costs over a period of up to 15 years for businesses developing in the district.

(f) The Public Utilities Commission may offer technical assistance in the preparation of the energy management plans developed and implemented pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, identifying best practices, innovations in technology, and potential funding sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 741, Sec. 2.   (AB 628)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14. Offshore Wind Generation [25991. - 25991.10.]

25991.

(a) (1) The commission, in coordination with the California Coastal Commission, the Ocean Protection Council, the State Lands Commission, the Office of Planning and Research, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, the Independent System Operator, and the Public Utilities Commission, and other relevant federal, state, and local agencies as needed, shall develop a strategic plan for offshore wind energy developments installed off the California coast in federal waters.

(2) Development of the strategic plan shall incorporate, but not delay, progress to advance responsible development of
 offshore wind in other relevant policy venues.

(b) (1) The commission shall submit the strategic plan to the Natural Resources Agency and the Legislature on or before June 30, 2023.

(2) The plan submitted to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) The strategic plan shall include, at a minimum, the following
 five chapters:

(1) Identification of sea space, including the findings and recommendations resulting from activities undertaken pursuant to Section 25991.2.

(2) Economic and workforce development and identification of port space and infrastructure, including the plan developed pursuant to Section 25991.3.

(3) Transmission planning, including the findings resulting from activities undertaken pursuant to Section 25991.4.

(4) Permitting, including the findings resulting from activities undertaken pursuant to Section 25991.5.

(5) Potential impacts on coastal resources, fisheries, Native American
 and Indigenous peoples, and national defense, and strategies for addressing those potential impacts.

(d) (1) The strategic plan shall emphasize and prioritize near-term actions, particularly related to port retrofits and investments and the workforce, to accommodate the probable immediate need for jobs and economic development.

(2) In considering port retrofits, the strategic plan shall strive for compatibility with other harbor tenants and ocean users to ensure that the local benefits related to offshore wind energy construction complement other local industries.

(3) The strategic plan shall emphasize and prioritize actions that will improve port infrastructure to support land-based work for the
 local workforce.

(e) The development of the strategic plan regarding workforce development shall include consultation with representatives of key labor organizations and apprenticeship programs that would be involved in dispatching and training the construction workforce.

(f) The commission shall provide an opportunity for public review and comment on a draft strategic plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 231, Sec. 2.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Sec. 25991.10.)
-------------------------------------------

25991.1.

(a) On or before June 1, 2022, the commission shall evaluate and quantify the maximum feasible capacity of offshore wind to achieve reliability, ratepayer, employment, and decarbonization benefits and shall establish megawatt offshore wind planning goals for 2030 and 2045.

(b) In establishing the goals pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall consider all of the following:

(1) The findings of the 2021 joint report issued pursuant to the former Section 454.53 of the Public Utilities Code.

(2) The need to develop a skilled and trained offshore wind workforce.

(3) The potential to attract supply-chain manufacturing for offshore wind components throughout the Pacific region.

(4) The need for reliable renewable energy that accommodates California’s shifting peak load.

(5) The generation profile of offshore wind off the coast of California.

(6) The need for economies of scale to reduce the costs of floating offshore wind.

(7) The need to initiate long-term transmission and infrastructure planning to facilitate delivery of offshore wind energy to Californians.

(8) The availability of federal tax incentives for offshore wind investments.

(9) The National Renewable Energy
 Laboratory report finding that California has 200 gigawatts of offshore wind technical power potential.

(10) The opportunity for California to participate in the federal government’s intention to deploy 30,000 megawatts of offshore wind by 2030 and to create a pathway to unlocking 110,000 megawatts by 2050.

(11) Any executive action from the Governor regarding offshore wind.

(12) Potential impacts on coastal resources, fisheries, Native American and Indigenous peoples, and national defense, and strategies for addressing those potential impacts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 35.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Sec. 25991.10.)
-------------------------------------------

25991.2.

(a) The commission, in coordination with the California Coastal Commission, Department of Fish and Wildlife, Ocean Protection Council, and State Lands Commission, shall work with stakeholders, other state, local, and federal agencies, and the offshore wind energy industry to identify suitable sea space for wind energy areas in federal waters sufficient to accommodate the offshore wind planning goals established pursuant to Section 25991.1, as follows:

(1) The commission shall first identify the sea space identified by the federal Bureau of Ocean Energy Management in its 2018 call for nominations, as published in the Federal Register, Volume 83, Number 203,
 on October 19, 2018, and any other relevant information necessary to achieve the 2030 offshore wind planning goal established pursuant to Section 25991.1.

(2) The commission, in coordination with the California Coastal Commission, Department of Fish and Wildlife, Ocean Protection Council, and State Lands Commission, shall next identify suitable sea space for a future phase of offshore wind leasing to accommodate the 2045 offshore wind planning goal established pursuant to Section 25991.1.

(b) In identifying suitable sea space, the commission shall consider all of the following:

(1) Existing data and information on offshore wind resource potential and commercial viability.

(2) Existing and necessary transmission and port infrastructure.

(3) Protection of cultural and biological resources with the goal of prioritizing least-conflict ocean areas.

(c) In fulfilling the requirements of this section, the commission shall incorporate the information developed by the Bureau of Ocean Energy Management California Intergovernmental Renewable Energy Task Force.

(d) The commission shall use the California Offshore Wind Energy Gateway, or functionally equivalent publicly accessible, commission-approved internet website, to provide
 relevant information developed pursuant to this section to the public.

(e) The commission, in coordination with the California Coastal Commission, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Ocean
 Protection Council, the State Lands Commission, stakeholders, other state, local, and federal agencies, and the offshore wind energy industry, shall make recommendations regarding potential significant adverse environmental impacts and use conflicts, such as avoidance, minimization, monitoring, mitigation, and adaptive management, consistent with California’s long-term renewable energy, greenhouse gas emission reduction, and biodiversity goals.

(f) Nothing in this section is intended to modify the authority of state agencies over project-specific siting and permitting.

(g) The findings and recommendations resulting from activities undertaken pursuant to this section shall be included in the chapter of the strategic plan relating to the identification of sea space
 as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 25991.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 231, Sec. 2.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Sec. 25991.10.)
-------------------------------------------

25991.3.

(a) Based on the sea spaces identified pursuant to Section 25991.2, the commission, in coordination with relevant state and local agencies, shall develop a plan to improve waterfront facilities that could support a range of floating offshore wind energy development activities, including construction and staging of foundations, manufacturing of components, final assembly, and long-term operations and maintenance facilities.

(b) The plan developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:

 (1) A detailed assessment of the necessary investments in California seaports to support offshore wind energy activities, including construction, assembly, and operations and maintenance. The assessment shall consider the potential availability of land and water acreage at each seaport, including competing and current uses, infrastructure feasibility, access to deep water, bridge height restrictions, and potentially impacted natural and cultural resources, including coastal resources, fisheries, and Native American and Indigenous peoples.

 (2) An analysis of the workforce development needs of the California offshore wind energy industry, including occupational safety requirements, the need to require the use of a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work, and the need for the Division of
 Apprenticeship Standards to develop curriculum for in-person classroom and laboratory advanced safety training for workers.

(3) Recommendations for workforce standards for offshore wind energy facilities and associated infrastructure, including, but not limited to, prevailing wage, skilled and trained workforce, apprenticeship, local hiring, and targeted hiring standards, that ensure sustained and equitable economic development benefits.

 (c) In developing the plan pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall consult with representatives of key labor organizations and apprenticeship programs that would be involved in dispatching and training the construction workforce.

(d) On or before December 31, 2022, the commission shall complete and submit to the Natural Resources Agency and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature a preliminary assessment of the economic benefits of offshore wind as they relate to seaport investments and workforce development needs and standards.

(e) The plan developed pursuant to this section shall be included in the chapter of the strategic plan relating to economic and workforce development and identification of port space and infrastructure
 as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 25991.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 231, Sec. 2.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Sec. 25991.10.)
-------------------------------------------

25991.4.

(a) The commission, in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission and the Independent System Operator, shall assess the transmission investments and upgrades necessary, including potential subsea transmission options, to support the 2030 and 2045 offshore wind planning goals established pursuant to Section 25991.1. This assessment shall include all relevant information on the cost of subsea high-voltage transmission and information made available by the Independent System Operator on the cost of network upgrades and the extent to which existing
 transmission infrastructure and available capacity could support offshore wind energy development.

(b) The findings resulting from activities undertaken pursuant to this section shall be included in the chapter of the strategic plan relating to transmission planning as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 25991.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 231, Sec. 2.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Sec. 25991.10.)
-------------------------------------------

25991.5.

(a) The commission shall develop and produce a permitting roadmap that describes timeframes and milestones for a coordinated, comprehensive, and efficient permitting process for offshore wind energy facilities and associated electricity and transmission infrastructure off the coast of California.

(b) In developing the permitting roadmap, the commission shall consult and meaningfully collaborate with all relevant local, state, and federal agencies, including, but not limited to, the California Coastal Commission, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, and the State Lands Commission,
 interested California Native American tribes, and affected stakeholders.

(c) The permitting roadmap shall include a goal for the permitting timeframe, clearly define local, state, and federal agency roles, responsibilities, and decisionmaking authority, and include interfaces with federal agencies, including timing, sequence, and coordination with federal permitting agencies, and coordination between reviews under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) and the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.).

(d) The commission shall provide an opportunity for stakeholder input in the development and communication of the permitting roadmap and an opportunity for public comment on a draft permitting roadmap.

(e) The findings resulting from activities undertaken pursuant to this section shall be included in the chapter of the strategic plan relating to permitting as specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 25991.

(f) On or before December 31, 2022, the commission shall complete and submit the permitting roadmap to the Natural Resources Agency and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature.
